Hawaii statutes.
§586-25 Good faith immunity. Any law
enforcement officer acting in good faith shall be immune from civil or criminal
liability in any action arising in connection with enforcement of a valid
foreign protective order or a foreign protective order that appears to be
authentic on its face pursuant to this part. [L 2000, c 186, pt of §7; am L
2002, c 11, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next